vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX b0 Y 191
SFX b0 er er/ er
SFX b0 er ant/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çant/ cer
SFX b0 ecer èce/ ecer
SFX b0 emer ème/ emer
SFX b0 ener ène/ ener
SFX b0 eper èpe/ eper
SFX b0 erer ère/ erer
SFX b0 eser èse/ eser
SFX b0 ever ève/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvre/ evrer
SFX b0 eter ète/ eter
SFX b0 eler èle/ eler
SFX b0 er è/ er
SFX b0 ecer èces/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmes/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènes/ ener
SFX b0 eper èpes/ eper
SFX b0 erer ères/ erer
SFX b0 eser èses/ eser
SFX b0 ever èves/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvres/ evrer
SFX b0 eter ètes/ eter
SFX b0 eler èles/ eler
SFX b0 er ons/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çons/ cer
SFX b0 er ez/ er
SFX b0 ecer ècent/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èment/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènent/ ener
SFX b0 eper èpent/ eper
SFX b0 erer èrent/ erer
SFX b0 eser èsent/ eser
SFX b0 ever èvent/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrent/ evrer
SFX b0 eter ètent/ eter
SFX b0 eler èlent/ eler
SFX b0 er ais/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çais/ cer
SFX b0 er ait/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çait/ cer
SFX b0 er ions/ er
SFX b0 er iez/ er
SFX b0 er aient/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çaient/ cer
SFX b0 er ai/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çai/ cer
SFX b0 er as/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer ças/ cer
SFX b0 er a/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer ça/ cer
SFX b0 er âmes/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çâmes/ cer
SFX b0 er âtes/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çâtes/ cer
SFX b0 er èrent/ er
SFX b0 ecer ècerai/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerai/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènerai/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperai/ eper
SFX b0 erer èrerai/ erer
SFX b0 eser èserai/ eser
SFX b0 ever èverai/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerai/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èterai/ eter
SFX b0 eler èlerai/ eler
SFX b0 ecer èceras/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmeras/ emer
SFX b0 ener èneras/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperas/ eper
SFX b0 erer èreras/ erer
SFX b0 eser èseras/ eser
SFX b0 ever èveras/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvreras/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èteras/ eter
SFX b0 eler èleras/ eler
SFX b0 ecer ècera/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmera/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènera/ ener
SFX b0 eper èpera/ eper
SFX b0 erer èrera/ erer
SFX b0 eser èsera/ eser
SFX b0 ever èvera/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrera/ evrer
SFX b0 eter ètera/ eter
SFX b0 eler èlera/ eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerons/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerons/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènerons/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperons/ eper
SFX b0 erer èrerons/ erer
SFX b0 eser èserons/ eser
SFX b0 ever èverons/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerons/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èterons/ eter
SFX b0 eler èlerons/ eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerez/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerez/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènerez/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperez/ eper
SFX b0 erer èrerez/ erer
SFX b0 eser èserez/ eser
SFX b0 ever èverez/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerez/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èterez/ eter
SFX b0 eler èlerez/ eler
SFX b0 ecer èceront/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmeront/ emer
SFX b0 ener èneront/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperont/ eper
SFX b0 erer èreront/ erer
SFX b0 eser èseront/ eser
SFX b0 ever èveront/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvreront/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èteront/ eter
SFX b0 eler èleront/ eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerais/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerais/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènerais/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperais/ eper
SFX b0 erer èrerais/ erer
SFX b0 eser èserais/ eser
SFX b0 ever èverais/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerais/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èterais/ eter
SFX b0 eler èlerais/ eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerait/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerait/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènerait/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperait/ eper
SFX b0 erer èrerait/ erer
SFX b0 eser èserait/ eser
SFX b0 ever èverait/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerait/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èterait/ eter
SFX b0 eler èlerait/ eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerions/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerions/ emer
SFX b0 ener ènerions/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperions/ eper
SFX b0 erer èrerions/ erer
SFX b0 eser èserions/ eser
SFX b0 ever èverions/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerions/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èterions/ eter
SFX b0 eler èlerions/ eler
SFX b0 ecer èceriez/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmeriez/ emer
SFX b0 ener èneriez/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperiez/ eper
SFX b0 erer èreriez/ erer
SFX b0 eser èseriez/ eser
SFX b0 ever èveriez/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvreriez/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èteriez/ eter
SFX b0 eler èleriez/ eler
SFX b0 ecer èceraient/ ecer
SFX b0 emer èmeraient/ emer
SFX b0 ener èneraient/ ener
SFX b0 eper èperaient/ eper
SFX b0 erer èreraient/ erer
SFX b0 eser èseraient/ eser
SFX b0 ever èveraient/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvreraient/ evrer
SFX b0 eter èteraient/ eter
SFX b0 eler èleraient/ eler
SFX b0 er asse/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çasse/ cer
SFX b0 er asses/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çasses/ cer
SFX b0 er ât/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çât/ cer
SFX b0 er assions/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çassions/ cer
SFX b0 er assiez/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çassiez/ cer
SFX b0 er assent/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çassent/ cer
SFX b0 ecer èce/ ecer
SFX b0 emer ème/ emer
SFX b0 ener ène/ ener
SFX b0 eper èpe/ eper
SFX b0 erer ère/ erer
SFX b0 eser èse/ eser
SFX b0 ever ève/ ever
SFX b0 evrer èvre/ evrer
SFX b0 eter ète/ eter
SFX b0 eler èle/ eler
SFX b0 er ons/ [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çons/ cer
SFX b0 er ez/ er
